District of Columbia statutes.
25-505

Fees for Arena C/X by Mayor.

The annual license fee for the retailer’s licenses, class Arena C/X, for the DC Arena shall be established by the Mayor.

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2082(n)(3), 57 DCR 181
Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-233, § 202(c), 62 DCR 438
D.C. Law 18-111, in the section heading, deleted “and Washington Convention Center” following “C/X”; and deleted “and for the Washington Convention Center” following “DC Arena”.
The 2015 amendment would have added “and the Soccer Stadium.”
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2082(n)(3) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2082(n)(3) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 202(c) of the Soccer Stadium Development Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-557, Dec. 30, 2014, 62 DCR 448, 20 STAT 4467).
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-233: Section 301 of D.C. Law 20-233 provided (1) that the act shall apply upon the date of inclusions of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan; (2) that the Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council of the certification; and (3) that the Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in the District of Columbia Register and that the date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the applicability of the act.